Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.540

Temporary emergency rules.

(1) If a class of food manufactured, processed, or packed in a locality is possibly contaminated with microorganisms injurious to health and the extent of injury cannot be determined once the food has entered into intrastate commerce, the department may adopt emergency rules for the manufacture, processing, or packing of that class of food in that locality. The rules must include the conditions necessary to protect public health and provide for the department to issue temporary permits during the emergency period.

(2) A person may not manufacture, process, or pack the class of food subject to the emergency unless holding a temporary permit under the emergency rules and complying with the conditions of the permit.

(3) To the extent practicable, such emergency rules must conform to federal emergency regulations, if any, addressing the same subject.

(4) A person may not introduce or deliver in intrastate commerce food that violates the requirements of this provision.

(5) A person may not falsely represent that food subject to temporary emergency rule complies with those rules through the use of a mark stamp, tag, label, or other counterfeit or false identification device.

(6) The department may immediately suspend a temporary emergency permit when its holder violates the conditions of the permit.

[ 2018 c 236 s 505.]